Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1002.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to authorize the board of a school district to award high school diplomas to World War II veterans and Korean conflict veterans under certain circumstances; to authorize the board of a school district to award high school diplomas to women who supported the war effort during World War II under certain circumstances; and to prescribe duties and responsibilities of certain state officers and officials. Sec. 341a. (1) The board of a school district may award a high school diploma to a woman who did not complete high school during World War II because that woman left high school to join the workforce or to join the war effort. In order to obtain a high school diploma under this section, a woman described in this subsection must apply in a form and manner prescribed by the Michigan veterans affairs agency and must meet both of the following requirements: (a) Between December 16, 1940 and December 31, 1946, the woman left high school prior to graduation to join the workforce or to join the war effort. (b) The woman did not graduate from high school. (2) An application for a diploma under this section may be completed by the woman's spouse, brother or sister, children, grandchildren, or any other individual designated by the woman applying for a diploma under this section.